tests/possessive.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tki.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tki.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] {i} after vowel":
    خوی<n><px3sp><acc> : خویونو
    إيو<n><px3sp><acc> : أيوينى
    کتاب<n><px3sp><acc> : کتابینی

  "[twol] {i} i:0" :
    التن<n><px3sp><acc> : التننى
    باخچا<n><px3sp><acc> : باخچاسنی

  "[twol] {i}C forms":
    اد<n><px1sg><nom> : ادم
    بابا<n><px1sg><nom> : بابام
    قيز<n><px1sg><nom> : قيزم
    قونشو<n><px1sg><nom> : قونشوم
    گون<n><px1sg><nom> : گونوم
    إيش<n><px2sg><nom> : إيشيى
    يازى<n><px2sg><nom> : يازيى
    قونشو<n><px2sg><nom> : قونشويو
    يول<n><px2sg><nom> : يولوى
    روح<n><px1pl><nom> : روحوموز
    گوز<n><px1pl><nom> : گوزوموز
    باخچا<n><px2pl><nom> : باخچایز
    اویون<n><px2sg><nom> : اویونون
    توپ<n><px2pl><nom> : توپویز
    گیون<n><px3sp><nom>: گیونی
    اوزو<adj><subst><px2sg><dat> : اوزويا
    خوی<n><px3sp><acc><@obj> : خويونو
    فات<n><pl><px3sp><acc><@obj>: سفاتلارنى
    خاترلاد<v><tv><ger_past><px3sp><acc>: خاترلاديغيني 
    بالا<n><px2sg><nom>: بالاي
انلا<v><tv><abil><ger_fut><px3sp><nom>: انلايابيلجغى
إمبراطوريه‌<n><px2sg><dat>: إمبراطوريه‌سینه‌
إمبراطوريه‌<n><px3sp><dat>: إمبراطوريه‌سین
إمبراطوريه‌<n><px2sg><dat>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: إمبراطوريه‌سین
إمبراطوريه‌<n><px3sp><dat>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: إمبراطوريه‌سین

عاصمه<n><acc>: عاصمه‌سی
عاصمه<n><px3sp><nom>: عاصمه‌سی
عاصمه<n><px3sp><nom>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: عاصمه‌سی
حمایه‌<n><px3sp><dat>: حمایه‌سینه
حمایه‌<n><px3sp><dat>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: حمایه‌سینه
إستطنبول<np><top><px2sg><nom>: إستطنبولون
کود<n><px2sg><acc>: کودونو
کود<n><px3sp><acc>: کودونو
